Utah, session 2026, HB381.
Section 1. Section 13-20-2 is amended to read:13-20-2Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Consumer" means an individual who enters into an agreement or contract for the transfer, lease, purchase of a new motor vehicle other than for purposes of resale, or sublease during the duration of the period defined under Section 13-20-5.(2)"Manufacturer" means manufacturer, importer, distributor, or anyone who is named as the warrantor on an express written warranty on a motor vehicle.(3)"Motor home" means a self-propelled vehicular unit, primarily designed as a temporary dwelling for travel, recreational, and vacation use.(4)(a)"Motor vehicle" includes:(i)a motor home, as defined in this section, but only the self-propelled vehicle and chassis sold in this state;(ii)a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102, sold in this state; and(iii)a motorcycle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102, sold in this state if the motorcycle is designed primarily for use and operation on paved highways.(b)"Motor vehicle" does not include:(i)those portions of a motor home designated, used, or maintained primarily as a mobile dwelling, office, or commercial space;(ii)a road tractor or truck tractor as defined in Section 41-1a-102;(iii)a mobile home as defined in Section 41-1a-102;(iv)any motor vehicle with a gross laden weight of over 14,000 pounds, except:(A)a motor home as defined under Subsection (3); and(B)a farm tractor as defined in Section 41-1a-102;(v)a motorcycle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102, if the motorcycle is designed primarily for use or operation over unimproved terrain;(vi)an electric assisted bicycle as defined in Section 41-6a-102;(vii)a moped as defined in Section 41-6a-102; or(viii)a motor assisted scooter as defined in Section 41-6a-102; or.(ix)a motor-driven cycle as defined in Section 41-6a-102.(5)"Recreational vehicle trailer" means a travel trailer, camping trailer, or fifth wheel trailer.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 13-35-102 is amended to read:13-35-102Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Dealership" means a site or location in this state:(a)at which a franchisee conducts the business of a new powersport vehicle dealer; and(b)that is identified as a new powersport vehicle dealer's principal place of business for registration purposes under Section 13-35-105.(2)"Department" means the Department of Commerce.(3)"Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of Commerce.(4)"Franchise" or "franchise agreement" means a written agreement, for a definite or indefinite period, in which:(a)a person grants to another person a license to use a trade name, trademark, service mark, or related characteristic; and(b)a community of interest exists in the marketing of new powersport vehicles, new powersport vehicle parts, and services related to the sale or lease of new powersport vehicles at wholesale or retail.(5)"Franchisee" means a person with whom a franchisor has agreed or permitted, in writing or in practice, to purchase, sell, or offer for sale new powersport vehicles manufactured, produced, represented, or distributed by the franchisor.(6)(a)"Franchisor" means a person who has, in writing or in practice, agreed with or permits a franchisee to purchase, sell, or offer for sale new powersport vehicles manufactured, produced, represented, or distributed by the franchisor, and includes:(i)the manufacturer or distributor of the new powersport vehicles;(ii)an intermediate distributor;(iii)an agent, officer, or field or area representative of the franchisor; and(iv)a person who is affiliated with a manufacturer or a representative or who directly or indirectly through an intermediary is controlled by, or is under common control with the manufacturer.(b)For purposes of Subsection (6)(a)(iv), a person is controlled by a manufacturer if the manufacturer has the authority directly or indirectly by law or by an agreement of the parties, to direct or influence the management and policies of the person.(7)"Lead" means the referral by a franchisor to a franchisee of an actual or potential customer for the purchase or lease of a new powersport vehicle, or for service work related to the franchisor's vehicles.(8)"Line-make" means the powersport vehicles that are offered for sale, lease, or distribution under a common name, trademark, service mark, or brand name of the franchisor, or manufacturer of the powersport vehicle.(9)"New powersport vehicle dealer" means a person who is engaged in the business of buying, selling, offering for sale, or exchanging new powersport vehicles either outright or on conditional sale, bailment, lease, chattel mortgage, or otherwise who has established a place of business for the sale, lease, trade, or display of powersport vehicles.(10)"Notice" or "notify" includes both traditional written communications and all reliable forms of electronic communication unless expressly prohibited by statute or rule.(11)(a)"Powersport vehicle" means:(i)an all-terrain type I, type II, or type III vehicle "ATV" defined in Section 41-22-2;(ii)a snowmobile as defined in Section 41-22-2;(iii)a motorcycle as defined in Section 41-1a-102;(iv)a personal watercraft as defined in Section 73-18-2; or(v)except as provided in Subsection (11)(b), a motor-driven cycle as defined in Section 41-6a-102; or(vi)(v)a moped as defined in Section 41-6a-102.(b)"Powersport vehicle" does not include:(i)an electric assisted bicycle defined in Section 41-6a-102;(ii)a motor assisted scooter as defined in Section 41-6a-102; or(iii)an electric personal assistive mobility device as defined in Section 41-6a-102.(12)"Relevant market area" means:(a)for a powersport dealership in a county that has a population of less than 225,000:(i)the county in which the powersport dealership exists or is to be established or relocated; and(ii)in addition to the county described in Subsection (12)(a)(i), the area within a 15-mile radius from the site of the existing, new, or relocated dealership; or(b)for a powersport dealership in a county that has a population of 225,000 or more, the area within a 10-mile radius from the site of the existing, new, or relocated dealership.(13)"Sale, transfer, or assignment" means any disposition of a franchise or an interest in a franchise, with or without consideration, including a bequest, inheritance, gift, exchange, lease, or license.(14)"Serve" or "served," unless expressly indicated otherwise by statute or rule, includes any reliable form of communication.(15)"Written," "write," "in writing," or other variations of those terms shall include all reliable forms of electronic communication.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 41-1a-102 is amended to read:41-1a-102Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Actual miles" means the actual distance a vehicle has traveled while in operation.(2)"Actual weight" means the actual unladen weight of a vehicle or combination of vehicles as operated and certified to by a weighmaster.(3)"All-terrain type I vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(4)"All-terrain type II vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(5)"All-terrain type III vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(6)"Alternative fuel vehicle" means:(a)an electric motor vehicle;(b)a hybrid electric motor vehicle;(c)a plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle; or(d)a motor vehicle powered exclusively by a fuel other than:(i)motor fuel;(ii)diesel fuel;(iii)natural gas; or(iv)propane.(7)"Amateur radio operator" means a person licensed by the Federal Communications Commission to engage in private and experimental two-way radio operation on the amateur band radio frequencies.(8)"Autocycle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-3-102.(9)"Automated driving system" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-26-102.1.(10)"Branded title" means a title certificate that is labeled:(a)rebuilt and restored to operation;(b)flooded and restored to operation; or(c)not restored to operation.(11)"Camper" means a structure designed, used, and maintained primarily to be mounted on or affixed to a motor vehicle that contains a floor and is designed to provide a mobile dwelling, sleeping place, commercial space, or facilities for human habitation or for camping.(12)"Certificate of title" means a document issued by a jurisdiction to establish a record of ownership between an identified owner and the described vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.(13)"Certified scale weigh ticket" means a weigh ticket that has been issued by a weighmaster.(14)"Commercial vehicle" means a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer used or maintained for the transportation of persons or property that operates:(a)as a carrier for hire, compensation, or profit; or(b)as a carrier to transport the vehicle owner's goods or property in furtherance of the owner's commercial enterprise.(15)"Commission" means the State Tax Commission.(16)"Consumer price index" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-13-102.(17)"Dealer" means a person engaged or licensed to engage in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging new or used vehicles, vessels, or outboard motors either outright or on conditional sale, bailment, lease, chattel mortgage, or otherwise or who has an established place of business for the sale, lease, trade, or display of vehicles, vessels, or outboard motors.(18)"Diesel fuel" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-13-102.(19)"Division" means the Motor Vehicle Division of the commission, created in Section 41-1a-106.(20)"Dynamic driving task" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-26-102.1.(21)"Electric motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is powered solely by an electric motor drawing current from a rechargeable energy storage system.(22)"Essential parts" means the integral and body parts of a vehicle of a type required to be registered in this state, the removal, alteration, or substitution of which would tend to conceal the identity of the vehicle or substantially alter the vehicle's appearance, model, type, or mode of operation.(23)"Farm tractor" means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing plows, mowing machines, and other implements of husbandry.(24)(a)"Farm truck" means a truck used by the owner or operator of a farm solely for the owner's or operator's own use in the transportation of:(i)farm products, including livestock and its products, poultry and its products, floricultural and horticultural products;(ii)farm supplies, including tile, fence, and any other thing or commodity used in agricultural, floricultural, horticultural, livestock, and poultry production; and(iii)livestock, poultry, and other animals and things used for breeding, feeding, or other purposes connected with the operation of a farm.(b)"Farm truck" does not include the operation of trucks by commercial processors of agricultural products.(25)"Fleet" means: (a)one or more commercial vehicles; or(b)for purposes of Section 41-1a-215, one or more personal vehicles.(26)"Foreign vehicle" means a vehicle of a type required to be registered, brought into this state from another state, territory, or country other than in the ordinary course of business by or through a manufacturer or dealer, and not registered in this state.(27)"Gross laden weight" means the actual weight of a vehicle or combination of vehicles, equipped for operation, to which shall be added the maximum load to be carried.(28)"Highway" or "street" means the entire width between property lines of every way or place of whatever nature when any part of it is open to the public, as a matter of right, for purposes of vehicular traffic.(29)"Hybrid electric motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that draws propulsion energy from onboard sources of stored energy that are both:(a)an internal combustion engine or heat engine using consumable fuel; and(b)a rechargeable energy storage system where energy for the storage system comes solely from sources onboard the vehicle.(30)(a)"Identification number" means the identifying number assigned by the manufacturer or by the division for the purpose of identifying the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.(b)"Identification number" includes a vehicle identification number, state assigned identification number, hull identification number, and motor serial number.(31)"Implement of husbandry" means a vehicle designed or adapted and used exclusively for an agricultural operation and only incidentally operated or moved upon the highways.(32)(a)"In-state miles" means the total number of miles operated in this state during the preceding year by fleet power units.(b)If a fleet is composed entirely of trailers or semitrailers, "in-state miles" means the total number of miles that those vehicles were towed on Utah highways during the preceding year.(33)"Interstate vehicle" means a commercial vehicle operated in more than one state, province, territory, or possession of the United States or foreign country.(34)"Jurisdiction" means a state, district, province, political subdivision, territory, or possession of the United States or any foreign country.(35)"Lienholder" means a person with a security interest in particular property.(36)"Manufactured home" means a transportable factory built housing unit constructed on or after June 15, 1976, according to the Federal Home Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (HUD Code), in one or more sections, which, in the traveling mode, is eight body feet or more in width or 40 body feet or more in length, or when erected on site, is 400 or more square feet, and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems.(37)"Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of constructing, manufacturing, assembling, producing, or importing new or unused vehicles, vessels, or outboard motors for the purpose of sale or trade.(38)"Military vehicle" means a vehicle of any size or weight that was manufactured for use by armed forces and that is maintained in a condition that represents the vehicle's military design and markings regardless of current ownership or use.(39)"Mobile home" means a transportable factory built housing unit built prior to June 15, 1976, in accordance with a state mobile home code which existed prior to the Federal Manufactured Housing and Safety Standards Act (HUD Code).(40)"Motor fuel" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-13-102.(41)(a)"Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on the highways.(b)"Motor vehicle" includes a roadable aircraft and a street-legal all-terrain vehicle.(c)"Motor vehicle" does not include:(i)an off-highway vehicle; or(ii)a motor assisted scooter as defined in Section 41-6a-102.(42)"Motorboat" means the same as that term is defined in Section 73-18c-102.(43)"Motorcycle" means:(a)a motor vehicle having a saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground; or(b)an autocycle. the same as that term is defined in Section 41-6a-102.(44)"Natural gas" means a fuel of which the primary constituent is methane.(45)(a)"Nonresident" means a person who is not a resident of this state as defined by Section 41-1a-202, and who does not engage in intrastate business within this state and does not operate in that business any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer within this state.(b)A person who engages in intrastate business within this state and operates in that business any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer in this state or who, even though engaging in interstate commerce, maintains a vehicle in this state as the home station of that vehicle is considered a resident of this state, insofar as that vehicle is concerned in administering this chapter.(46)"Odometer" means a device for measuring and recording the actual distance a vehicle travels while in operation, but does not include any auxiliary odometer designed to be periodically reset.(47)"Off-highway implement of husbandry" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(48)"Off-highway vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(49)(a)"Operate" means:(i)to navigate a vessel; or(ii)collectively, the activities performed in order to perform the entire dynamic driving task for a given motor vehicle by:(A)a human driver as defined in Section 41-26-102.1; or(B)an engaged automated driving system.(b)"Operate" includes testing of an automated driving system.(50)"Original issue license plate" means a license plate that is of a format and type issued by the state in the same year as the model year of a vehicle that is a model year 1973 or older.(51)"Outboard motor" means a detachable self-contained propulsion unit, excluding fuel supply, used to propel a vessel.(52)(a)"Owner" means a person, other than a lienholder, holding title to a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor whether or not the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor is subject to a security interest.(b)If a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or installment sale or mortgage of the vehicle with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or mortgagor, or if the vehicle is the subject of a security agreement, then the conditional vendee, mortgagor, or debtor is considered the owner for the purposes of this chapter.(c)If a vehicle is the subject of an agreement to lease, the lessor is considered the owner until the lessee exercises the lessee's option to purchase the vehicle.(53)"Park model recreational vehicle" means a unit that:(a)is designed and marketed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, travel, or seasonal use;(b)is not permanently affixed to real property for use as a permanent dwelling;(c)requires a special highway movement permit for transit; and(d)is built on a single chassis mounted on wheels with a gross trailer area not exceeding 400 square feet in the setup mode.(54)"Personal vehicle" means a vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle.(55)"Personalized license plate" means a license plate that has displayed on it a combination of letters, numbers, or both as requested by the owner of the vehicle and assigned to the vehicle by the division.(56)(a)"Pickup truck" means a two-axle motor vehicle with motive power manufactured, remanufactured, or materially altered to provide an open cargo area.(b)"Pickup truck" includes a motor vehicle with the open cargo area covered with a camper, camper shell, tarp, removable top, or similar structure.(57)"Plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle" means a hybrid electric motor vehicle that has the capability to charge the battery or batteries used for vehicle propulsion from an off-vehicle electric source, such that the off-vehicle source cannot be connected to the vehicle while the vehicle is in motion.(58)"Pneumatic tire" means a tire in which compressed air is designed to support the load.(59)"Preceding year" means a period of 12 consecutive months fixed by the division that is within 16 months immediately preceding the commencement of the registration or license year in which proportional registration is sought.  The division in fixing the period shall conform it to the terms, conditions, and requirements of any applicable agreement or arrangement for the proportional registration of vehicles.(60)"Public garage" means a building or other place where vehicles or vessels are kept and stored and where a charge is made for the storage and keeping of vehicles and vessels.(61)"Receipt of surrender of ownership documents" means the receipt of surrender of ownership documents described in Section 41-1a-503.(62)"Reconstructed vehicle" means a vehicle of a type required to be registered in this state that is materially altered from its original construction by the removal, addition, or substitution of essential parts, new or used.(63)"Recreational vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-14-102.(64)"Registration" means a document issued by a jurisdiction that allows operation of a vehicle or vessel on the highways or waters of this state for the time period for which the registration is valid and that is evidence of compliance with the registration requirements of the jurisdiction.(65)"Registration decal" means the decal issued by the division that is evidence of compliance with the division's registration requirements.(66)(a)"Registration year" means a 12 consecutive month period commencing with the completion of the applicable registration criteria.(b)For administration of a multistate agreement for proportional registration the division may prescribe a different 12-month period.(67)"Repair or replacement" means the restoration of vehicles, vessels, or outboard motors to a sound working condition by substituting any inoperative part of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, or by correcting the inoperative part.(68)"Replica vehicle" means:(a)a street rod that meets the requirements under Subsection 41-21-1(3)(a)(i)(B); or(b)a custom vehicle that meets the requirements under Subsection 41-6a-1507(1)(a)(i)(B).(69)"Restored-modified vehicle" means a motor vehicle that has been restored and modified with modern parts and technology, including emission control technology and an on-board diagnostic system.(70)"Road tractor" means a motor vehicle designed and used for drawing other vehicles and constructed so it does not carry any load either independently or any part of the weight of a vehicle or load that is drawn.(71)"Roadable aircraft" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-10-102.(72)"Sailboat" means the same as that term is defined in Section 73-18-2.(73)"Security interest" means an interest that is reserved or created by a security agreement to secure the payment or performance of an obligation and that is valid against third parties.(74)"Semitrailer" means the same as the term "trailer."(75)"Special group license plate" means a type of license plate designed for a particular group of people or a license plate authorized and issued by the division in accordance with Section 41-1a-418 or Part 16, Sponsored Special Group License Plates.(76)(a)"Special interest vehicle" means a vehicle used for general transportation purposes and that is:(i)20 years or older from the current year; or(ii)a make or model of motor vehicle recognized by the division director as having unique interest or historic value.(b)In making a determination under Subsection (76)(a), the division director shall give special consideration to:(i)a make of motor vehicle that is no longer manufactured;(ii)a make or model of motor vehicle produced in limited or token quantities;(iii)a make or model of motor vehicle produced as an experimental vehicle or one designed exclusively for educational purposes or museum display; or(iv)a motor vehicle of any age or make that has not been substantially altered or modified from original specifications of the manufacturer and because of its significance is being collected, preserved, restored, maintained, or operated by a collector or hobbyist as a leisure pursuit.(77)(a)"Special mobile equipment" means a vehicle:(i)not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property;(ii)not designed to operate in traffic; and(iii)only incidentally operated or moved over the highways.(b)"Special mobile equipment" includes:(i)farm tractors;(ii)off-road motorized construction or maintenance equipment including backhoes, bulldozers, compactors, graders, loaders, road rollers, tractors, and trenchers; and(iii)ditch-digging apparatus.(c)"Special mobile equipment" does not include a commercial vehicle as defined under Section 72-9-102.(78)"Specially constructed vehicle" means a vehicle of a type required to be registered in this state, not originally constructed under a distinctive name, make, model, or type by a generally recognized manufacturer of vehicles, and not materially altered from its original construction.(79)(a)"Standard license plate" means a license plate for general issue described in Subsection 41-1a-402(1).(b)"Standard license plate" includes a license plate for general issue that the division issues before January 1, 2024.(80)"State impound yard" means a yard for the storage of a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor that meets the requirements of rules made by the commission as described in Subsection 41-1a-1101(7).(81)"Street-legal all-terrain vehicle" or "street-legal ATV" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-6a-102.(82)"Symbol decal" means the decal that is designed to represent a special group and displayed on a special group license plate.(83)"Title" means the right to or ownership of a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.(84)(a)"Total fleet miles" means the total number of miles operated in all jurisdictions during the preceding year by power units.(b)If fleets are composed entirely of trailers or semitrailers, "total fleet miles" means the number of miles that those vehicles were towed on the highways of all jurisdictions during the preceding year.(85)"Tow truck motor carrier" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-9-102.(86)"Tow truck operator" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-9-102.(87)"Trailer" means a vehicle:(a)without motive power; and(b)designed for:(i)carrying persons or property; and(ii)being drawn by a motor vehicle.(88)"Transferee" means a person to whom the ownership of property is conveyed by sale, gift, or any other means except by the creation of a security interest.(89)"Transferor" means a person who transfers the person's ownership in property by sale, gift, or any other means except by creation of a security interest.(90)"Travel trailer," "camping trailer," or "fifth wheel trailer" means a portable vehicle without motive power, designed as a temporary dwelling for travel, recreational, or vacation use that does not require a special highway movement permit when drawn by a self-propelled motor vehicle.(91)"Truck tractor" means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and not constructed to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load that is drawn.(92)"Vehicle" includes a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, off-highway vehicle, camper, park model recreational vehicle, manufactured home, and mobile home.(93)"Vessel" means the same as that term is defined in Section 73-18-2.(94)"Vintage vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-21-1.(95)"Waters of this state" means the same as that term is defined in Section 73-18-2.(96)"Weighmaster" means a person, association of persons, or corporation permitted to weigh vehicles under this chapter.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 41-6a-102 is amended to read:41-6a-102Effective 05/06/26Partially Repealed 07/01/27. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Alley" means a street or highway intended to provide access to the rear or side of lots or buildings in urban districts and not intended for through vehicular traffic.(2)"All-terrain type I vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(3)"All-terrain type II vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(4)"All-terrain type III vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(5)"Authorized emergency vehicle" includes:(a)a fire department vehicle;(b)a police vehicle;(c)an ambulance; and(d)other publicly or privately owned vehicles as designated by the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety.(6)"Autocycle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-3-102.(7)(a)"Bicycle" means a wheeled vehicle:(i)propelled by human power by feet or hands acting upon pedals or cranks;(ii)with a seat or saddle designed for the use of the operator;(iii)designed to be operated on the ground; and(iv)whose wheels are not less than 14 inches in diameter.(b)"Bicycle" includes an electric assisted bicycle.(c)"Bicycle" does not include scooters and similar devices.(8)(a)"Bicycle lane" means a portion of a highway that has been designated by a highway authority through striping, signage, pavement markings, or barriers for the preferential or exclusive use of bicycle, electric assisted bicycle, and motor assisted scooter traffic.(b)"Bicycle lane" does not include shared lanes intended for both motor vehicle and bicycle travel.(9)(a)"Bus" means a motor vehicle:(i)designed for carrying more than 15 passengers and used for the transportation of persons; or(ii)designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation.(b)"Bus" does not include a taxicab.(10)(a)"Circular intersection" means an intersection that has an island, generally circular in design, located in the center of the intersection where traffic passes to the right of the island.(b)"Circular intersection" includes:(i)roundabouts;(ii)rotaries; and(iii)traffic circles.(11)"Class 1 electric assisted bicycle" means an electric assisted bicycle equipped with a motor or electronics that:(a)provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling; and(b)ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour.(12)"Class 2 electric assisted bicycle" means an electric assisted bicycle equipped with a motor or electronics that:(a)may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle; and(b)is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour.(13)"Class 3 electric assisted bicycle" means an electric assisted bicycle equipped with a motor or electronics that:(a)provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling;(b)ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 28 miles per hour; and(c)is equipped with a speedometer.(14)"Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety.(15)"Controlled-access highway" means a highway, street, or roadway:(a)designed primarily for through traffic; and(b)to or from which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access, except at points as determined by the highway authority having jurisdiction over the highway, street, or roadway.(16)"Crosswalk" means:(a)that part of a roadway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from:(i)(A)the curbs; or(B)in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway; and(ii)in the absence of a sidewalk on one side of the roadway, that part of a roadway included within the extension of the lateral lines of the existing sidewalk at right angles to the centerline; or(b)any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface.(17)"Department" means the Department of Public Safety.(18)"Direct supervision" means oversight at a distance within which:(a)visual contact is maintained; and(b)advice and assistance can be given and received.(19)"Divided highway" means a highway divided into two or more roadways by:(a)an unpaved intervening space;(b)a physical barrier; or(c)a clearly indicated dividing section constructed to impede vehicular traffic.(20)"Echelon formation" means the operation of two or more snowplows arranged side-by-side or diagonally across multiple lanes of traffic of a multi-lane highway to clear snow from two or more lanes at once.(21)(a)"Electric assisted bicycle" means a bicycle with an electric motor that:(i)has a power output of not more than 750 watts;(ii)has fully operable pedals;(iii)has permanently affixed cranks that were installed at the time of the original manufacture;(iv)is fully operable as a bicycle without the use of the electric motor; and(v)is one of the following:(A)a class 1 electric assisted bicycle;(B)a class 2 electric assisted bicycle;(C)a class 3 electric assisted bicycle; or(D)a programmable electric assisted bicycle.(b)"Electric assisted bicycle" does not include:(i)a moped;(ii)a motor assisted scooter;(iii)an electric motorcycle;(iii)(iv)a motorcycle; or(iv)a motor-driven cycle; or(v)any other vehicle with less than four wheels that is designed, manufactured, intended, or advertised by the seller to have any of the following capabilities or features, or that is modifiable or is modified to have any of the following capabilities or features:(A)has the ability to attain the speed of 20 miles per hour or greater on motor power alone;(B)is equipped with a continuous rated motor power of more than 750 watts or greater;(C)is equipped with foot pegs for the operator at the time of manufacture, or requires installation of a pedal kit to have operable pedals; or(D)if equipped with multiple operating modes and a throttle, has one or more modes that exceed 20 miles per hour on motor power alone.(22)(a)"Electric personal assistive mobility device" means a self-balancing device with:(i)two nontandem wheels in contact with the ground;(ii)a system capable of steering and stopping the unit under typical operating conditions;(iii)an electric propulsion system with average power of one horsepower or 750 watts;(iv)a maximum speed capacity on a paved, level surface of 12.5 miles per hour; and(v)a deck design for a person to stand while operating the device.(b)"Electric personal assistive mobility device" does not include a wheelchair.(23)"Electric motorcycle" means a motorcycle:(a)powered by an electric motor of more than 750 watts; or(b)capable of exceeding a speed of 20 miles per hour using the power of the electric motor alone.(23)(24)"Electric unicycle" means a self-balancing personal transportation device that:(a)has a single wheel;(b)is powered by an electric motor that utilizes gyroscopes and accelerometers to stabilize the rider; and(c)is designed for the operator to face in the direction of travel while operating the device.(24)(25)"Explosives" means a chemical compound or mechanical mixture commonly used or intended for the purpose of producing an explosion and that contains any oxidizing and combustive units or other ingredients in proportions, quantities, or packing so that an ignition by fire, friction, concussion, percussion, or detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause a sudden generation of highly heated gases, and the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects or of causing death or serious bodily injury.(25)(26)"Farm tractor" means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement, for drawing plows, mowing machines, and other implements of husbandry.(26)(27)"Flammable liquid" means a liquid that has a flashpoint of 100 degrees F. or less, as determined by a Tagliabue or equivalent closed-cup test device.(27)(28)"Freeway" means a controlled-access highway that is part of the interstate system as defined in Section 72-1-102.(28)(29)(a)"Golf cart" means a device that:(i)is designed for transportation by players on a golf course;(ii)has not less than three wheels in contact with the ground;(iii)has an unladen weight of less than 1,800 pounds;(iv)is designed to operate at low speeds; and(v)is designed to carry not more than six persons including the driver.(b)"Golf cart" does not include:(i)a low-speed vehicle or an off-highway vehicle;(ii)a motorized wheelchair;(iii)an electric personal assistive mobility device;(iv)an electric assisted bicycle;(v)a motor assisted scooter;(vi)a personal delivery device, as defined in Section 41-6a-1119; or(vii)a mobile carrier, as defined in Section 41-6a-1120.(29)(30)"Gore area" means the area delineated by two solid white lines that is between a continuing lane of a through roadway and a lane used to enter or exit the continuing lane including similar areas between merging or splitting highways.(30)(31)"Gross weight" means the weight of a vehicle without a load plus the weight of any load on the vehicle.(32)(a)"High power electric device" means a self-propelled vehicle, other than a motor vehicle subject to the title and registration requirement described in Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act, powered by an electric motor that is capable of traveling more than 20 miles per hour on the power of the electric motor alone.(b)"High power electric device" includes:(i)an electric assisted bicycle that has modified or tampered equipment beyond the manufacturer's original settings to change the speed or power output; and(ii)an electric assisted bicycle that has been modified to be capable of traveling more than 20 miles per hour on the power of the electric motor alone.(31)(33)"Hi-rail vehicle" means a roadway maintenance vehicle that is:(a)manufactured to meet Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards; and(b)equipped with retractable flanged wheels that allow the vehicle to travel on a highway or railroad tracks.(32)(34)"Highway" means the entire width between property lines of every way or place of any nature when any part of it is open to the use of the public as a matter of right for vehicular travel.(33)(35)"Highway authority" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-1-102.(34)(36)"Interdicted person" means the same as that term is defined in Section 32B-1-102.(35)(37)(a)"Intersection" means the area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two or more highways that join one another.(b)Where a highway includes two roadways 30 feet or more apart:(i)every crossing of each roadway of the divided highway by an intersecting highway is a separate intersection; and(ii)if the intersecting highway also includes two roadways 30 feet or more apart, then every crossing of two roadways of the highways is a separate intersection.(c)"Intersection" does not include the junction of an alley with a street or highway.(36)(38)"Island" means an area between traffic lanes or at an intersection for control of vehicle movements or for pedestrian refuge designated by:(a)pavement markings, which may include an area designated by two solid yellow lines surrounding the perimeter of the area;(b)channelizing devices;(c)curbs;(d)pavement edges; or(e)other devices.(37)(39)(a)"Lane filtering" means, when operating a motorcycle other than an autocycle, the act of overtaking and passing another vehicle that is stopped in the same direction of travel in the same lane.(b)"Lane filtering" does not include lane splitting.(38)(40)(a)"Lane splitting" means, when operating a motorcycle other than an autocycle, the act of riding a motorcycle between clearly marked lanes for traffic traveling in the same direction of travel while traffic is in motion.(b)"Lane splitting" does not include lane filtering.(39)(41)"Law enforcement agency" means the same as that term is as defined in Section 53-1-102.(40)(42)"Limited access highway" means a highway:(a)that is designated specifically for through traffic; and(b)over, from, or to which neither owners nor occupants of abutting lands nor other persons have any right or easement, or have only a limited right or easement of access, light, air, or view.(41)(43)"Local highway authority" means the legislative, executive, or governing body of a county, municipal, or other local board or body having authority to enact laws relating to traffic under the constitution and laws of the state.(42)(44)(a)"Low-speed vehicle" means a four wheeled motor vehicle that:(i)is designed to be operated at speeds of not more than 25 miles per hour; and(ii)has a capacity of not more than six passengers, including a conventional driver or fallback-ready user if on board the vehicle, as those terms are defined in Section 41-26-102.1.(b)"Low-speed vehicle" does not include a golfcart or an off-highway vehicle.(43)(45)"Metal tire" means a tire, the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard nonresilient material.(44)(46)(a)"Mini-motorcycle" means a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle that has a seat or saddle that is less than 24 inches from the ground as measured on a level surface with properly inflated tires.(b)"Mini-motorcycle" does not include a moped or a motor assisted scooter.(c)"Mini-motorcycle" does not include a motorcycle that is:(i)designed for off-highway use; and(ii)registered as an off-highway vehicle under Section 41-22-3.(45)(47)"Mobile home" means:(a)a trailer or semitrailer that is:(i)designed, constructed, and equipped as a dwelling place, living abode, or sleeping place either permanently or temporarily; and(ii)equipped for use as a conveyance on streets and highways; or(b)a trailer or a semitrailer whose chassis and exterior shell is designed and constructed for use as a mobile home, as defined in Subsection (45)(a), (47)(a), but that is instead used permanently or temporarily for:(i)the advertising, sale, display, or promotion of merchandise or services; or(ii)any other commercial purpose except the transportation of property for hire or the transportation of property for distribution by a private carrier.(46)(48)"Mobility disability" means the inability of a person to use one or more of the person's extremities or difficulty with motor skills, that may include limitations with walking, grasping, or lifting an object, caused by a neuro-muscular, orthopedic, or other condition.(47)(49)(a)"Moped" means a motor-driven cycle motorcycle having:(i)pedals to permit propulsion by human power; and(ii)a motor that:(A)produces not more than two brake horsepower; and(B)is not capable of propelling the cycle at a speed in excess of 30 miles per hour on level ground.(b)If an internal combustion engine is used, the displacement may not exceed 50 cubic centimeters and the moped shall have a power drive system that functions directly or automatically without clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged.(c)"Moped" does not include:(i)an electric assisted bicycle; or(ii)a motor assisted scooter.(48)(50)(a)"Motor assisted scooter" means a self-propelled device with:(i)at least two wheels in contact with the ground;(ii)a braking system capable of stopping the unit under typical operating conditions;(iii)an electric motor not exceeding 2,000 watts;(iv)either:(A)handlebars and a deck design for a person to stand while operating the device; or(B)handlebars and a seat designed for a person to sit, straddle, or stand while operating the device;(v)a design for the ability to be propelled by human power alone; and(vi)a maximum speed of 20 miles per hour on a paved level surface.(b)"Motor assisted scooter" does not include: an electric assisted bicycle.(i)an electric assisted bicycle; or(ii)a motor-driven cycle.(49)(51)(a)"Motor vehicle" means a vehicle that is self-propelled and a vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails.(b)"Motor vehicle" does not include:(i)vehicles moved solely by human power;(ii)motorized wheelchairs;(iii)an electric personal assistive mobility device;(iv)an electric assisted bicycle;(v)a motor assisted scooter;(vi)a personal delivery device, as defined in Section 41-6a-1119; or(vii)a mobile carrier, as defined in Section 41-6a-1120.(50)(52)(a)"Motorcycle" means:(a)(i)a motor vehicle, other than a tractor, having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel with not more than three wheels in contact with the ground; or(b)(ii)an autocycle.;(iii)a moped; or(iv)an electric motorcycle.(b)"Motorcycle" does not include:(i)an electric assisted bicycle; or(ii)a motor assisted scooter.(51)(a)"Motor-driven cycle" means a motorcycle, moped, and a motorized bicycle having:(i)an engine with less than 150 cubic centimeters displacement; or(ii)a motor that produces not more than five horsepower.(b)"Motor-driven cycle" does not include:(i)an electric personal assistive mobility device;(ii)a motor assisted scooter; or(iii)an electric assisted bicycle.(52)(53)"Off-highway implement of husbandry" means the same as that term is defined under Section 41-22-2.(53)(54)"Off-highway motorcycle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-22-2.(54)(55)"Off-highway vehicle" means the same as that term is defined under Section 41-22-2.(55)(56)"Operate" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-1a-102.(56)(57)"Operator" means:(a)a human driver, as defined in Section 41-26-102.1, that operates a vehicle; or(b)an automated driving system, as defined in Section 41-26-102.1, that operates a vehicle.(57)(58)"Other on-track equipment" means a railroad car, hi-rail vehicle, rolling stock, or other device operated, alone or coupled with another device, on stationary rails.(58)(59)(a)"Park" or "parking" means the standing of a vehicle, whether the vehicle is occupied or not.(b)"Park" or "parking" does not include:(i)the standing of a vehicle temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading property or passengers; or(ii)a motor vehicle with an engaged automated driving system that has achieved a minimal risk condition, as those terms are defined in Section 41-26-102.1.(59)(60)"Peace officer" means a peace officer authorized under Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications, to direct or regulate traffic or to make arrests for violations of traffic laws.(60)(61)"Pedestrian" means a person traveling:(a)on foot; or(b)in a wheelchair.(61)(62)"Pedestrian traffic-control signal" means a traffic-control signal used to regulate pedestrians.(62)(63)"Person" means a natural person, firm, copartnership, association, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, governmental agency, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.(63)(64)"Pole trailer" means a vehicle without motive power:(a)designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, or pole, or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle; and(b)that is ordinarily used for transporting long or irregular shaped loads including poles, pipes, or structural members generally capable of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections.(64)(65)"Private road or driveway" means every way or place in private ownership and used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons.(65)(66)"Programmable electric assisted bicycle" means an electric assisted bicycle with capability to switch or be programmed by a user to function as a class 1 electric assisted bicycle, class 2 electric assisted bicycle, or class 3 electric assisted bicycle, provided thatif the electric assisted bicycle fully conforms with the respective requirements of each class of electric assisted bicycle when operated in that mode.(66)(67)"Railroad" means a carrier of persons or property upon cars operated on stationary rails.(67)(68)"Railroad sign or signal" means a sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train.(68)(69)"Railroad train" means a locomotive propelled by any form of energy, coupled with or operated without cars, and operated upon rails.(69)(70)"Restored-modified vehicle" means the same as the term defined in Section 41-1a-102.(70)(71)"Right-of-way" means the right of one vehicle or pedestrian to proceed in a lawful manner in preference to another vehicle or pedestrian approaching under circumstances of direction, speed, and proximity that give rise to danger of collision unless one grants precedence to the other.(71)(72)(a)"Roadway" means that portion of highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel.(b)"Roadway" does not include the sidewalk, berm, or shoulder, even though any of them are used by persons riding bicycles or other human-powered vehicles.(c)"Roadway" refers to any roadway separately but not to all roadways collectively, if a highway includes two or more separate roadways.(72)(73)"Safety zone" means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and that is protected, marked, or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone.(73)(74)(a)"School bus" means a motor vehicle that:(i)complies with the color and identification requirements of the most recent edition of "Minimum Standards for School Buses"; "The National School Transportation Specifications and Procedures"; and(ii)is used to transport school children to or from school or school activities.(b)"School bus" does not include a vehicle operated by a common carrier in transportation of school children to or from school or school activities.(74)(75)"Self-balancing electric skateboard" means a device similar to a skateboard that:(a)has a single wheel;(b)is powered by an electric motor; (c)is not capable of exceeding a speed of 20 miles per hour using the power of the electric motor alone; and(c)(d)is designed for the operator to face perpendicular to the direction of travel while operating the device.(75)(76)(a)"Semitrailer" means a vehicle with or without motive power:(i)designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle; and(ii)constructed so that some part of its weight and that of its load rests on or is carried by another vehicle.(b)"Semitrailer" does not include a pole trailer.(76)(77)"Shoulder area" means:(a)that area of the hard-surfaced highway separated from the roadway by a pavement edge line as established in the current approved "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices"; or(b)that portion of the road contiguous to the roadway for accommodation of stopped vehicles, for emergency use, and for lateral support.(77)(78)"Sidewalk" means that portion of a street between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines intended for the use of pedestrians.(78)(79)(a)"Soft-surface trail" means a marked trail surfaced with sand, rock, or dirt that is designated for the use of a bicycle.(b)"Soft-surface trail" does not mean a trail:(i)where the use of a motor vehicle or an electric assisted bicycle is prohibited by a federal law, regulation, or rule; or(ii)located in whole or in part on land granted to the state or a political subdivision subject to a conservation easement that prohibits the use of a motorized vehicle.(79)(80)"Solid rubber tire" means a tire of rubber or other resilient material that does not depend on compressed air for the support of the load.(80)(81)"Stand" or "standing" means the temporary halting of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, for the purpose of and while actually engaged in receiving or discharging passengers.(81)(82)"Stop" when required means complete cessation from movement.(82)(83)"Stop" or "stopping" when prohibited means any halting even momentarily of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except when:(a)necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic; or(b)in compliance with the directions of a peace officer or traffic-control device.(83)(84)"Street-legal all-terrain vehicle" or "street-legal ATV" means an all-terrain type I vehicle, all-terrain type II vehicle, or all-terrain type III vehicle, or an off-highway motorcycle, that is modified to meet the requirements of Section 41-6a-1509 to operate on highways in the state in accordance with Section 41-6a-1509.(84)(85)"Street-legal novel vehicle" means a vehicle registered as a novel vehicle under Section 41-27-201 that is modified to meet the requirements of Section 41-6a-1509 to operate on highways in the state in accordance with Section 41-6a-1509.(85)(86)"Tow truck operator" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-9-102.(86)(87)"Tow truck motor carrier" means the same as that term is defined in Section 72-9-102.(87)(88)"Traffic" means pedestrians, bicyclists, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highway for the purpose of travel.(88)(89)"Traffic signal preemption device" means an instrument or mechanism designed, intended, or used to interfere with the operation or cycle of a traffic-control signal.(89)(90)"Traffic-control device" means a sign, signal, marking, or device not inconsistent with this chapter placed or erected by a highway authority for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic.(90)(91)"Traffic-control signal" means a device, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically operated, by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and permitted to proceed.(91)(92)(a)"Trailer" means a vehicle with or without motive power designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and constructed so that no part of its weight rests upon the towing vehicle.(b)"Trailer" does not include a pole trailer.(92)(93)"Truck" means a motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property.(93)(94)"Truck tractor" means a motor vehicle:(a)designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles; and(b)constructed to carry a part of the weight of the vehicle and load drawn by the truck tractor.(94)(95)"Two-way left turn lane" means a lane:(a)provided for vehicle operators making left turns in either direction;(b)that is not used for passing, overtaking, or through travel; and(c)that has been indicated by a lane traffic-control device that may include lane markings.(95)(96)"Urban district" means the territory contiguous to and including any street, in which structures devoted to business, industry, or dwelling houses are situated at intervals of less than 100 feet, for a distance of a quarter of a mile or more.(96)(97)"Vehicle" means a device in, on, or by which a person or property is or may be transported or drawn on a highway, except a mobile carrier, as defined in Section 41-6a-1120, or a device used exclusively on stationary rails or tracks.(97)(98)"Wheelie" means a maneuver performed while operating a motorcycle whereby the front wheel of the motorcycle is raised off of the ground.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 41-6a-526 is amended to read:41-6a-526Effective 05/06/26. Drinking alcoholic beverage and open containers in motor vehicle prohibited -- Definitions -- Exceptions.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Alcoholic beverage" has the same meaning as defined in Section 32B-1-102.(b)"Chartered bus" has the same meaning as defined in Section 32B-1-102.(c)"Limousine" has the same meaning as defined in Section 32B-1-102.(d)(i)"Passenger compartment" means the area of the vehicle normally occupied by the operator and passengers.(ii)"Passenger compartment" includes areas accessible to the operator and passengers while traveling, including a utility or glove compartment.(iii)"Passenger compartment" does not include a separate front or rear trunk compartment or other area of the vehicle not accessible to the operator or passengers while inside the vehicle.(e)"Waters of the state" has the same meaning as defined in Section 73-18-2.(2)A person may not drink an alcoholic beverage while operating a golf cart, a motor vehicle, a motor assisted scooter, or a class 2 an electric assisted bicycle, or while a passenger in a motor vehicle, whether the vehicle is moving, stopped, or parked on any highway or waters of the state.(3)A person may not keep, carry, possess, transport, or allow another to keep, carry, possess, or transport in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle, on a golf cart, on a motor assisted scooter, or on a class 2 an electric assisted bicycle, when the vehicle is on any highway or waters of the state, any container that contains an alcoholic beverage if the container has been opened, itsthe container's seal broken, or the contents of the container partially consumed.(4)Subsections (2) and (3) do not apply to a passenger:(a)in the living quarters of a motor home or camper;(b)who has carried an alcoholic beverage onto a limousine or chartered bus that is in compliance with Subsections 32B-4-415(4)(b) and (c); or(c)in a motorboat on the waters of the state.(5)Subsection (3) does not apply to passengers traveling in any licensed taxicab or bus.(6)A violation of Subsection (2) or (3) is a class C misdemeanor.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 41-6a-706.5 is amended to read:41-6a-706.5Effective 05/06/26. Definitions -- Operation of motor vehicle near a vulnerable user of a highway prohibited -- Endangering a vulnerable user of a highway prohibited.(1)As used in this section, "vulnerable user of a highway" means:(a)a pedestrian, including a person engaged in work upon a highway or upon utilities facilities along a highway or providing emergency services within the right-of-way of a highway;(b)a person riding an animal; or(c)a person operating any of the following on a highway:(i)a farm tractor or implement of husbandry, without an enclosed shell;(ii)a skateboard;(iii)roller skates;(iv)in-line skates;(v)a bicycle;(vi)an electric- assisted bicycle;(vii)an electric personal assistive mobility device;(viii)a high power electric device;(viii)(ix)a moped;(ix)(x)a motor assisted scooter;(x)a motor-driven cycle;(xi)a motorcycle;(xii)a manual wheelchair; or(xiii)a golf cart.(2)An operator of a motor vehicle may not knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly:(a)operate a motor vehicle within three feet of a vulnerable user of a highway;(b)distract or attempt to distract a vulnerable user of a highway for the purpose of causing violence or injury to the vulnerable user of a highway;(c)force or attempt to force a vulnerable user of a highway off of the roadway for a purpose unrelated to public safety; or(d)cause a motor vehicle to emit an excessive amount of exhaust in a manner that distracts or endangers a vulnerable user of a highway.(3)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a violation of Subsection (2) is an infraction.(b)A violation of Subsection (2) that results in bodily injury to the vulnerable user of a highway is a class C misdemeanor.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 41-6a-1115 is amended to read:41-6a-1115Effective 05/05/27. Motor assisted scooters -- Conflicting provisions -- Restrictions -- Penalties.(1)(a)Except as otherwise provided in this section, a motor assisted scooter is subject to the provisions under this chapter for a bicycle.(b)For a personan individual operating a motor assisted scooter, the following provisions do not apply:(i)seating positions under Section 41-6a-1501;(ii)required lights, horns, and mirrors under Section 41-6a-1506;(iii)entitlement to full use of a lane under Subsection 41-6a-1502(1); and(iv)driver licensing requirements under Section 53-3-202.(c)A person An individual may operate a motor assisted scooter across a roadway in a crosswalk, except that the personindividual may not operate the motor assisted scooter in a negligent manner in the crosswalk:(i)so as to collide with a:(A)a pedestrian; or(B)person an individual operating a bicycle or vehicle or device propelled by human power; or(ii)at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the existing conditions, giving regard to the actual and potential hazards then existing.(2)An individual eight years old or older and younger than 16 years old may operate a motor assisted scooter with the motor running on a highway if the individual:(a)is under direct supervision of the individual's parent or another responsible adult; or(b)has a personal electric vehicle safety certificate as described in Section 41-6a-1512.(3)An individual 16 years old or older may operate a motor assisted scooter with the motor running on a highway without supervision.(2)(4)A person An individual under eight years of ageold may not operate a motor assisted scooter with the motor running on any public property, highway, path, or sidewalkon a highway.(3)(5)A person An individual may not operate a motor assisted scooter:(a)in a public parking structure;(b)on a freeway;(b)(c)on public property posted as an area prohibiting bicycles;(c)(d)while carrying more personsindividuals at one time than the number for which it is designed; (d)(e)that has been structurally or mechanically altered from the original manufacturer's design, except for an alteration by, or done at the request of, a person who rents the motor assisted scooter to lower the maximum speed for the motor assisted scooter; or(e)(f)at a speed of greater than 15 miles per hour or in violation of Subsection 41-6a-1115.1(3).(4)(6)Except where posted or prohibited by local ordinance, a motor assisted scooter is considered a nonmotorized vehicle if it is being used with the motor turned off.(5)(7)An owner may not authorize or knowingly permit a personan individual under the age of 1816 to operate a motor assisted scooter in violation of this section.(6)(8)A person An individual who violates this section is guilty of an infraction.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 41-6a-1115.5 is amended to read:41-6a-1115.5Effective 05/05/27. Electric assisted bicycles -- Restrictions -- Penalties.(1)Except as otherwise provided in this section, an electric assisted bicycle is subject to the provisions under this chapter for a bicycle.(2)An individual may operate an electric assisted bicycle on a path or trail designated for the use of a bicycle.(3)(a)A local authority or state agency may adopt an ordinance or rule to regulate or restrict the use of an electric assisted bicycle, or a specific classification of an electric assisted bicycle, on a sidewalk, path, or trail within the jurisdiction of the local authority or state agency.(b)When enacting ordinances or making rules related to the use of a pathway or soft-surface trail, and during the planning or construction of a pathway or soft-surface trail, a local authority or state agency shall consider accommodations and increased trail access by a person with a mobility disability.(4)An individual under 16 years old may not operate a class 3 electric assisted bicycle.(5)An individual under 14 years old may not operate an electric assisted bicycle with the electric motor engaged on any public property, highway, path, or sidewalk unless the individual is under the direct supervision of the individual's parent or guardian.(4)An individual eight years old or older and younger than 16 years old may operate an electric assisted bicycle with the motor engaged on a highway if the individual:(a)is under direct supervision of the individual's parent or another responsible adult; or(b)has a personal electric vehicle safety certificate as described in Section 41-6a-1512.(5)An individual 16 years old or older may operate an electric assisted bicycle with the motor engaged on a highway without supervision.(6)An individual under eight years old may not operate an electric assisted bicycle with the electric motor engaged on any public property, highway, path, or sidewalka highway.(7)The owner of an electric assisted bicycle may not authorize or knowingly permit an individual to operate an electric assisted bicycle in violation of this section.(8)(a)Beginning January 1, 2017, each A Utah-based manufacturer of an electric assisted bicycle and eacha distributor of an electric assisted bicycle in Utah shall permanently affix a label in a prominent location on the electric assisted bicycle.(b)Each manufacturer and each distributerdistributor shall ensure that the label is printed in Arial font, in 9-point type or larger, and includes the:(i)appropriate electric assisted bicycle classification number described in Section 41-6a-102;(ii)top assisted speed; and(iii)wattage of the motor.(c)A Utah-based manufacturer or commercial seller shall ensure that a programmable electric assisted bicycle is equipped with a conspicuous label indicating the class or classes of electric assisted bicycle of which the programmable electric assisted bicycle is capable of operating.(d)Beginning May 1, 2024, a A commercial seller of any new or used vehicle with less than four wheels that is powered by an electric motor that is not an electric assisted bicycle shall clearly and conspicuously provide the following disclosure to a prospective purchaser at the time of sale and in any advertising materials, online website, or social media post promoting the vehicle: "THIS VEHICLE IS NOT AN "ELECTRIC ASSISTED BICYCLE" AS DEFINED BY UTAH MOTOR VEHICLE CODE AND IS INSTEAD A TYPE OF MOTOR VEHICLE AND SUBJECT TO APPLICABLE MOTOR VEHICLE LAWS IF USED ON PUBLIC ROADS OR PUBLIC LANDS. A HELMET MAY BE REQUIRED WHILE OPERATING. YOUR INSURANCE POLICIES MAY NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR ACCIDENTS INVOLVING THE USE OF THIS VEHICLE. TO DETERMINE IF COVERAGE IS PROVIDED YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY OR AGENT."(e)For a disclosure described in Subsection (8)(d), the commercial seller shall ensure that the disclosure appears in bold, capital letters at least the same font size as the description of the vehicle.(f)A person's actions to knowingly advertise, offer for sale, or sell a vehicle that is not an electric assisted bicycle as an electric bicycle, electric assisted bicycle, electric bike, or e-bike without making the disclosure described in Subsection (8)(d) constitutes prima facie evidence of a deceptive trade practice under Section 13-11a-3.(9)(a)An individual who violates this section is guilty of an infraction. (b)If an individual younger than 18 years old violates a provision of this section, a peace officer may hold an electric assisted bicycle involved in a violation of this section or for a moving violation under this chapter and release the electric assisted bicycle to a parent or guardian of the individual accused of a violation as described in Section 41-6a-1115.6.(10)A class 2 An electric assisted bicycle is subject to the restrictions of Section 41-6a-526.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 41-6a-1115.6 is enacted to read:41-6a-1115.6Effective 05/06/26. Electric assisted bicycles -- Law enforcement hold.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Hold" means an action by a peace officer to take into custody and retain an individual's personal electric device.(b)"Personal electric vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-6a-1512.(c)"Release" means an action by a peace officer to transfer custody of an individual's personal electric device to an individual.(2)If a peace officer observes an individual under 18 years old commit a violation of this chapter and the violation occurred while the individual was operating a personal electric vehicle, the peace officer may hold the personal electric vehicle.(3)If a peace officer holds an individual's personal electric vehicle as described in Subsection (2), the peace officer may release the personal electric vehicle to only the individual's parent or guardian.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 41-6a-1116 is amended to read:41-6a-1116Effective 05/06/26. Electric personal assistive mobility devices -- Conflicting provisions -- Restrictions -- Penalties.(1)(a)Except as otherwise provided in this section, an electric personal assistive mobility device is subject to the provisions under this chapter for a bicycle, moped, or a motor-driven cycle.(b)For a person an individual operating an electric personal assistive mobility device, the following provisions do not apply:(i)seating positions under Section 41-6a-1501;(ii)required lights, horns, and mirrors under Section 41-6a-1506;(iii)entitlement to full use of a lane under Subsection 41-6a-1502(1); and(iv)driver licensing requirements under Section 53-3-202.(2)A person An individual under 1516 years old may not operate an electric personal assistive mobility device using the motor unless the person individual is under the direct supervision of the person's individual's parent or guardiana responsible adult.(3)A person An individual may not operate an electric personal assistive mobility device:(a)on a highway consisting of a total of four or more lanes designated for regular vehicular traffic, except when operating in a lane designated for bicycle traffic;(b)on a highway with a posted speed limit greater than 35 miles per hour, except when operating in a lane designated for bicycle traffic; or(c)that has been structurally or mechanically altered from the original manufacturer's design.(4)An owner may not authorize or knowingly permit a person an individual to operate an electric personal assistive mobility device in violation of this section.(5)A person An individual may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device on a sidewalk if the operation does not:(a)exceed a speed which is greater than is reasonable or prudent having due regard for weather, visibility, and pedestrians; or(b)endanger the safety of other persons or property.(6)A person An individual operating an electric personal assistive mobility device shall yield to a pedestrian or other person individual using a mobility aid.(7)(a)An electric personal assistive mobility device may be operated on:(i)a path or trail designed for the use of a bicycle; or(ii)on a highway where a bicycle is allowed, including any lane designated for bicycle traffic regardless of the posted speed limit or number of general purpose lanes.(b)A person An individual operating an electric personal assistive mobility device in an area described in Subsection (7)(a)(i) or (ii) is subject to the laws governing bicycles.(8)A person An individual may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device at night if the device is equipped with or the operator is wearing:(a)a lamp pointing to the front that emits a white light visible from a distance of not less than 300 feet in front of the device; and(b)front, rear, and side reflectors.(9)A person An individual may not operate an electric personal assistive mobility device while carrying an article that prevents the person individual from keeping both hands on the handlebars or interferes with the person'sindividual's ability to safely operate the electric personal assistive mobility device.(10)Only one person individual may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device at a time.(11)A person An individual may not park an electric personal assistive mobility device on a highway or sidewalk in a manner that obstructs vehicular or pedestrian traffic.(12)A person An individual who violates this section is guilty of an infraction.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 41-6a-1501 is amended to read:41-6a-1501Effective 05/06/26. Motorcycle-- Place for operator to ride -- Passengers.(1)A person An individual operating a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall ride only on the permanent and regular seat attached to the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b):(i)a person an individual operating a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may not carry any other person individual on the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle; and(ii)a passenger may not ride on a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle.(b)If a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is designed to carry more than one personindividual, a passenger may ride on:(i)the permanent and regular seat, if designed for two personsindividuals; or(ii)another seat firmly attached to the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle at the rear or side of the operator.(3)A person An individual shall ride on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle only while sitting astride the seat, facing forward, with one leg on either side of the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle.(4)A person An individual may not operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle while carrying a package, bundle, or other article whichthat prevents the person operator from keeping both hands on the handlebars.(5)An operator of a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may not carry a person an individual and a person an individual may not ride in a position that interferes with:(a)the operation or control of the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle; or(b)the view of the operator.(6)A violation of this section is an infraction.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 41-6a-1502 is amended to read:41-6a-1502Effective 05/06/26. Motorcycles and all-terrain type I vehicles -- Operation on public highways.(1)(a)A motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle is entitled to full use of a lane.(b)An individual may not operate a motor vehicle in a manner that deprives a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle of the full use of a lane.(c)This Subsection (1) does not apply to motorcycles or motor-driven cycles operated two abreast in a single lane.(2)The operator of a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may not overtake and pass in the same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken.(3)(a)Except as described in Subsection (3)(b), an individual may not operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle between:(i)lanes of traffic; or(ii)adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.(b)Subsection (3)(a) does not apply to an individual operating a motorcycle engaging in lane filtering as described in Section 41-6a-704.(4)Motorcycles or motor-driven cycles may not be operated more than two abreast in a single lane.(5)Subsections (2) and (3)(a) do not apply to peace officers acting in the peace officers' official capacities.(6)The provisions of this section also apply to all-terrain type I vehicles.(7)A violation of this section is an infraction.

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 41-6a-1503 is amended to read:41-6a-1503Effective 05/06/26. Motorcycle-- Attaching to another vehicle prohibited.(1)A person An individual riding on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may not attach himselfthemselves to any other vehicle on a roadway.(2)A violation of this section is an infraction.

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 41-6a-1504 is amended to read:41-6a-1504Effective 05/06/26. Motorcycle-- Footrests for passenger -- Height of handlebars limited.(1)A motorcycle or motor-driven vehicle carrying a passenger on a public highway, other than in a sidecar or enclosed cab, shall be equipped with footrests for the passenger.(2)A person An individual may not operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle with handlebars above shoulder height.(3)A violation of this section is an infraction.

Section 15:
Section 15. Section 41-6a-1505 is amended to read:41-6a-1505Effective 05/06/26. Motorcycle-- Protective headgear -- Closed cab excepted -- Electric assisted bicycles, motor assisted scooters, electric personal assistive mobility devices.(1)A person An individual under the age of 2121 years old may not operate or ride any of the following on a highway unless the personindividual is wearing protective headgear that complies with specifications adopted under Subsection (3)Subsection (4):(a)a motorcycle;(b)a motor-driven cycle;(c)a class 3 electric assisted bicycle; or(b)an electric assisted bicycle;(c)a motor assisted scooter;(d)a high power electric device; or(d)(e)an autocycle that is not fully enclosed.(2)This section does not apply to persons an individual riding within an enclosed cab.(3)This section does not apply to an individual operating a class 1 electric assisted bicycle or a motor assisted scooter rented from a business or corporate entity.(3)(4)The following standards and specifications for protective headgear are adopted:(a)49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.218 related to protective headgear for motorcycles; and(b)16 C.F.R. Part 1203 related to protective headgear for bicycles, motor assisted scooters, and electric personal assistive mobility devices.(4)(5)A court shall waive $8 of a fine charged to a person an individual operating a vehicle described in Subsection (1) for a moving traffic violation if the person individual was:(a)21 years of age or older old or older at the time of operation; and(b)wearing protective headgear that complies with the specifications adopted under Subsection (3) Subsection (4) at the time of operation.(5)(6)The failure to wear protective headgear:(a)does not constitute contributory or comparative negligence on the part of a person an individual seeking recovery for injuries; and(b)may not be introduced as evidence in any civil litigation on the issue of negligence, injuries, or the mitigation of damages.(6)(7)Notwithstanding Subsection (4)Subsection (5), a court may not waive $8 of a fine charged to a person an individual operating a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle for a driving under the influence violation of Section 41-6a-502.(7)(8)(a)A violation of this section is an infraction.(b)Upon conviction of a violation of this section, a court may not impose a fine exceeding:(i)$25 for an individual who violates this section while operating an electric assisted bicycle or a motor assisted scooter; and(ii)$110 for an individual who violates this section while operating a motorcycle or a high power electric device.

Section 16:
Section 16. Section 41-6a-1506 is amended to read:41-6a-1506Effective 05/06/26. Motorcycles -- Required equipment -- Brakes.(1)A motorcycle and a motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with the following items:(a)one head lamp that, when factory equipped with an automatic lighting ignition system, may not be disconnected;(b)one tail lamp;(c)either a tail lamp or a separate lamp which illuminates the rear license plate with a white light;(d)one red reflector on the rear, either separate or as part of the tail lamp;(e)one stop lamp;(f)a braking system, other than parking brake, in accordance with Section 41-6a-1623;(g)a horn or warning device in accordance with Section 41-6a-1625;(h)a muffler and emission control system in accordance with Section 41-6a-1626;(i)a mirror in accordance with Section 41-6a-1627; and(j)tires in accordance with Section 41-6a-1636.(2)An autocycle shall be equipped with the following items:(a)a seatbelt for each seat installed in the autocycle in accordance with Section 41-6a-1628;(b)at least one head lamp that, when factory equipped with an automatic lighting ignition system, may not be disconnected;(c)at least one tail lamp;(d)either a tail lamp or a separate lamp that illuminates the rear license plate with a white light;(e)at least one red reflector, either separate or as part of the tail lamp or tail lamps;(f)at least one stop lamp;(g)a braking system, other than a parking brake, in accordance with Section 41-6a-1623;(h)a horn or warning device in accordance with Section 41-6a-1625;(i)a muffler and emission control system in accordance with Section 41-6a-1626  that, when factory equipped, may not be removed;(j)a mirror in accordance with Section 41-6a-1627; and(k)tires in accordance with Section 41-6a-1636.(3)The department may require an inspection of the braking system on a motor-driven cycle and disapprove a braking system that is not designed or constructed as to insure reasonable and reliable performance in actual use in accordance with Section 41-6a-1623.(4)A person may not operate a motor-driven cycle on a highway if the department has disapproved the braking system on the motor-driven cycle.(5)(a)Upon notice to the party to whom the motor-driven cycle is registered, the department may suspend the registration of a motor-driven cycle if the department has disapproved the braking system under this section.(b)The Motor Vehicle Division shall, under Subsection 41-1a-109(1)(e) or (2), refuse to register a motor-driven cycle if it has reason to believe the motor-driven cycle has a braking system disapproved under this section.(6)(3)A violation of this section is an infraction.

Section 17:
Section 17. Section 41-6a-1511 is enacted to read:41-6a-1511Effective 05/06/26. Electric motorcycles and high power electric devices.(1)(a)An individual operating a high power electric device, including an electric motorcycle, has all rights and is subject to all provisions of this chapter applicable to an operator of a motorcycle.(b)Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a high power electric device without a vehicle identification number that is not a motorcycle is not subject to the requirement to maintain liability insurance as described in Section 41-12a-301.(2)(a)A local authority may adopt an ordinance or a state agency may adopt a rule to regulate or restrict the use of a high power electric device on a sidewalk, path, or trail within the jurisdiction of the local authority or state agency.(b)When enacting ordinances or making rules related to the use of a pathway or soft-surface trail, and during the planning or construction of a pathway or soft-surface trail, a local authority or state agency shall consider accommodations and increased trail access by a person with a mobility disability.(3)An individual younger than 16 years old may not operate a high power electric device on a highway.(4)The owner of a high power electric device may not authorize or knowingly permit an individual to operate a high power electric device in violation of this section.(5)An individual may not operate a high power electric device on a freeway.(6)(a)Beginning January 1, 2027, a commercial seller of any new or used vehicle shall clearly and conspicuously provide the disclosure described in Subsection (6)(b) to a prospective purchaser at the time of sale and in any advertising materials, online website, or social media post promoting the vehicle if the vehicle:(i)has fewer than four wheels;(ii)is powered by an electric motor; and(iii)is not an electric assisted bicycle.(b)The disclosure required under Subsection (6)(a) shall state: "THIS VEHICLE IS NOT AN "ELECTRIC ASSISTED BICYCLE" AS DEFINED BY UTAH MOTOR VEHICLE CODE AND IS INSTEAD A TYPE OF MOTOR VEHICLE AND SUBJECT TO APPLICABLE MOTOR VEHICLE LAWS IF USED ON PUBLIC ROADS OR PUBLIC LANDS. A HELMET MAY BE REQUIRED WHILE OPERATING. YOUR INSURANCE POLICIES MAY NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR ACCIDENTS INVOLVING THE USE OF THIS VEHICLE. TO DETERMINE IF COVERAGE IS PROVIDED YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY OR AGENT."(c)A commercial seller of a new or used high power electric device shall inform prospective purchasers of state law requirements for insurance and registration applying to operators of high power electric devices.(7)Except for offenses otherwise provided under this chapter, an individual who violates this section is guilty of an infraction.

Section 18:
Section 18. Section 41-6a-1512 is enacted to read:41-6a-1512Effective 05/05/27. Safety program -- Personal electric vehicles.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Personal electric vehicle" means an electric assisted bicycle, high power electric device, or motor assisted scooter.(b)"Personal electric vehicle safety certificate" means the personal electric vehicle safety certificate issued under Subsection (2)(c).(c)"Program" means the personal electric vehicle safety education and training program described in Subsection (2)(a).(2)The department shall:(a)design and administer a personal electric vehicle safety education and training program to develop and instill the knowledge, attitudes, habits, and skills necessary for the safe and ethical operation of a personal electric vehicle on a highway;(b)in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules that establish curriculum standards for the program;(c)issue a personal electric vehicle safety certificate to an individual who successfully completes the program; and(d)ensure that an individual may complete the program online.(3)The department may:(a)contract with another person to implement the program; and(b)collect a fee of $10 or less from each applicant for administration of the program.(4)(a)An individual eight years old or older and younger than 16 years old may not operate a personal electric vehicle on a highway in this state unless:(i)the individual obtains a personal electric vehicle safety certificate; or(ii)the individual is under direct supervision of a parent or responsible adult while operating a personal electric device on a highway.(b)Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), an individual who is younger than 16 years old may not operate a high power electric device on a highway.(c)An individual who is younger than eight years old may not operate a personal electric vehicle on a highway.(5)An individual younger than 16 years old may not operate a personal electric vehicle on a freeway.(6)A person may not rent a personal electric vehicle to an individual under 16 years old unless the individual who will operate the personal electric vehicle:(a)presents the certificate described in Subsection (2)(c); or(b)is under direct supervision of the individual's parent or a responsible adult.(7)(a)In addition to the governmental immunity granted in Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah, the state is immune from suit for any act, or failure to act, in any capacity relating to the personal electric vehicle safety education and training program.(b)The state is not responsible for any insufficiency or inadequacy in the quality of training provided by this program.(8)A violation of this section by an operator of a personal electric vehicle:(a)does not constitute contributory or comparative negligence on the part of a party in an action for recovery of damages; and(b)may not be introduced as evidence in any civil litigation on the issue of negligence, injuries, or the mitigation of damages.(9)A violation of this section is an infraction and a fine associated with a conviction under this section may not exceed $150 per offense.

Section 19:
Section 19. Section 41-6a-1513 is enacted to read:41-6a-1513Effective 05/06/26. Electric mobility devices -- Law enforcement hold.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Hold" means an action by a peace officer to take into custody and retain an individual's personal electric device.(b)"Personal electric vehicle" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-6a-1512.(c)"Release" means an action by a peace officer to transfer custody of an individual's personal electric device to an individual.(2)If a peace officer observes an individual under 18 years old commit a violation of this chapter and the violation occurred while the individual was operating a personal electric vehicle, the peace officer may hold the personal electric vehicle.(3)If a peace officer holds an individual's personal electric vehicle as described in Subsection (2), the peace officer may release the personal electric vehicle to only the individual's parent or guardian.

Section 20:
Section 20. Section 41-22-2 is amended to read:41-22-2Effective 05/06/26Partially Repealed 07/01/27. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Advisory council" means an advisory council appointed by the Division of Outdoor Recreation that has within the advisory council's duties advising on policies related to the use of off-highway vehicles.(2)"All-terrain type I vehicle" means any motor vehicle 52 inches or less in width, having an unladen dry weight of 1,500 pounds or less, traveling on three or more low pressure tires, having a seat designed to be straddled by the operator, and designed for or capable of travel over unimproved terrain.(3)(a)"All-terrain type II vehicle" means any motor vehicle 80 inches or less in width, traveling on four or more low pressure tires, having a steering wheel, non-straddle seating, a rollover protection system, and designed for or capable of travel over unimproved terrain, and is:(i)an electric-powered vehicle; or(ii)a vehicle powered by an internal combustion engine and has an unladen dry weight of 3,500 pounds or less.(b)"All-terrain type II vehicle" does not include golf carts, any vehicle designed to carry a person with a disability, any vehicle not specifically designed or modified primarily for recreational use on unimproved terrain, or farm tractors as defined under Section 41-1a-102.(4)(a)"All-terrain type III vehicle" means any other motor vehicle, not defined in Subsection (2), (3), (13), or (24), designed for or capable of travel over unimproved terrain.(b)"All-terrain type III vehicle" does not include golf carts, any vehicle designed to carry a person with a disability, any vehicle not specifically designed or modified primarily for recreational use on unimproved terrain, or farm tractors as defined under Section 41-1a-102.(5)"Commission" means the Outdoor Adventure Commission.(6)"Cross-country" means across natural terrain and off an existing highway, road, route, or trail.(7)"Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling off-highway vehicles at wholesale or retail.(8)"Division" means the Division of Outdoor Recreation.(9)"Low pressure tire" means any pneumatic tire six inches or more in width designed for use on wheels with rim diameter of 14 inches or less and utilizing an operating pressure of 10 pounds per square inch or less as recommended by the vehicle manufacturer.(10)"Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of manufacturing off-highway vehicles.(11)(a)"Motor vehicle" means every vehicle which is self-propelled.(b)"Motor vehicle" includes an off-highway vehicle.(12)"Motorcycle" means every motor vehicle having a saddle for the use of the operator and designed to travel on not more than two tires.the same as that term is defined in Section 41-6a-102.(13)"Off-highway implement of husbandry" means every all-terrain type I vehicle,  all-terrain type II vehicle, all-terrain type III vehicle, off-highway motorcycle, or snowmobile that is used by the owner or the owner's agent for agricultural operations.(14)"Off-highway motorcycle" means an off-highway vehicle that is a motorcycle and is designed for use primarily off-highway.(15)"Off-highway vehicle" means any snowmobile, all-terrain type I vehicle, all-terrain type II vehicle, all-terrain type III vehicle, or off-highway motorcycle.(16)(a)"Off-highway vehicle facility" means a facility or area designated for use by an off-highway vehicle.(b)"Off-highway vehicle facility" includes a trail, trailhead, storage shed, water and electric infrastructure, or other infrastructure that provides or increases access to an area designated for use by an off-highway vehicle.(17)"Operate" means to control the movement of or otherwise use an off-highway vehicle.(18)"Operator" means the person who is in actual physical control of an off-highway vehicle.(19)"Organized user group" means an off-highway vehicle organization incorporated as a nonprofit corporation in the state under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, for the purpose of promoting the interests of off-highway vehicle recreation.(20)"Owner" means a person, other than a person with a security interest, having a property interest or title to an off-highway vehicle and entitled to the use and possession of that vehicle.(21)"Public land" means land owned or administered by any federal or state agency or any political subdivision of the state.(22)"Register" means the act of assigning a registration number to an off-highway vehicle.(23)"Roadway" is used as defined in Section 41-6a-102.(24)"Snowmobile" means any motor vehicle designed for travel on snow or ice and steered and supported in whole or in part by skis, belts, cleats, runners, or low pressure tires, and equipped with a saddle or seat for the use of the rider.(25)"Street or highway" means the entire width between boundary lines of every way or place of whatever nature, when any part of it is open to the use of the public for vehicular travel.(26)"Street-legal all-terrain vehicle" or "street-legal ATV" has the same meaning as defined in Section 41-6a-102.

Section 21:
Section 21. Section 41-22-3.5 is amended to read:41-22-3.5Effective 05/06/26. Staggered registration dates -- Registration renewal.(1)Unless exempted under Section 41-22-9, or unless the off-highway vehicle or street-legal all-terrain vehicle is registered for a 24-month period as provided in Section 41-1a-215.5, everyan off-highway vehicle registration, everya registration card, and everya registration sticker issued under this chapter for the first registration of the off-highway vehicle in this state, continues in effect for a period of 12 months beginning with the first day of the calendar month of registration and does not expire until the last day of the same month in the following year.(2)If the last day of the registration period falls on a day in which the appropriate state or county offices are not open for business, the registration of the off-highway vehicle is extended to 12 midnight of the next business day.(3)(a)The divisionMotor Vehicle Division may receive applications for registration renewal and issue new registration cards at any time prior tobefore the expiration of the registration, subject to the availability of renewal materials.(b)Applications An application for registration renewal shall be made in accordance with Section 41-22-3.(4)(a)The new registration shall retain the same expiration month as recorded on the original registration even if the registration has expired.(b)The year of registration expiration shall be changed to reflect the renewed registration period.(5)If the registration renewal application is an application generated by the divisionMotor Vehicle Division through its automated system, the owner need not surrender the last registration card or duplicate.

Section 22:
Section 22. Section 53-3-202 is amended to read:53-3-202Effective 05/05/27. Drivers shall be licensed -- Violation.(1)A human driver may not drive a motor vehicle or an autocycle on a highway in this state unless the human driver is:(a)granted the privilege to operate a motor vehicle by being licensed as a driver by the division under this chapter;(b)driving an official United States Government class D motor vehicle with a valid United States Government driver permit or license for that type of vehicle;(c)(i)driving a road roller, road machinery, or any farm tractor or implement of husbandry temporarily drawn, moved, or propelled on the highways; and(ii)driving the vehicle described in Subsection (1)(c)(i) in conjunction with a construction or agricultural activity;(d)a nonresident who is at least 16 years old and younger than 18 years old who has in the nonresident's immediate possession a valid license certificate issued to the nonresident in the nonresident's home state or country and is driving in the class or classes identified on the home state license certificate, except those persons referred to in Part 6, Drivers' License Compact, of this chapter;(e)a nonresident who is at least 18 years old and who has in the nonresident's immediate possession a valid license certificate issued to the nonresident in the nonresident's home state or country if driving in the class or classes identified on the home state license certificate, except those persons referred to in Part 6, Drivers' License Compact, of this chapter;(f)driving under a learner permit in accordance with Section 53-3-210.5;(g)driving with a temporary license certificate issued in accordance with Section 53-3-207; or(h)exempt under Title 41, Chapter 22, Off-highway Vehicles.(2)A human driver may not drive a motor vehicle or perform lateral or longitudinal vehicle motion control for a vehicle being towed by another motor vehicle upon a highway unless the human driver:(a)is licensed under this chapter to drive a motor vehicle of the type or class of motor vehicle being towed; or(b)is exempted under either Subsection (1)(b) or (1)(c).(3)(a)A human driver may not drive a motor vehicle as a taxicab on a highway of this state unless the person individual has a valid class D driver license issued by the division.(b)A human driver may not drive a motor vehicle as a private passenger carrier on a highway of this state unless the human driver has:(i)a taxicab endorsement issued by the division on the human driver's license certificate; or(ii)a commercial driver license with:(A)a taxicab endorsement;(B)a passenger endorsement; or(C)a school bus endorsement.(c)Nothing in Subsection (3)(b) is intended to exempt a human driver driving a motor vehicle as a private passenger carrier from regulation under other statutory and regulatory schemes, including:(i)49 C.F.R. Parts 350-399, Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations;(ii)Title 34, Chapter 36, Transportation of Workers, and rules adopted by the Labor Commission in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and(iii)Title 72, Chapter 9, Motor Carrier Safety Act, and rules adopted by the Motor Carrier Division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsections (4)(b), (c), (d), and (e), a A human driver may not operate:(i)a motorcycle, including an electric motorcycle, unless the human driver has a valid class D driver license and a motorcycle endorsement issued under this chapter; or(ii)a street legal all-terrain vehicle unless the human driver has a valid class D driver license; or.(iii)a motor-driven cycle unless the human driver has a valid class D driver license and a motorcycle endorsement issued under this chapter.(b)A Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), a human driver operating a moped, as defined in Section 41-6a-102, is not required to have a motorcycle endorsement issued under this chapter.(c)An individual operating an electric assisted bicycle, as defined in Section 41-6a-102, is not required to have a valid class D driver license or a motorcycle endorsement issued under this chapter.(d)(c)An individual is not required to have a valid class D driver license if the person is:(i)operating a motor assisted scooter, as defined in Section 41-6a-102, in accordance with Section 41-6a-1115; or(ii)operating an electric personal assistive mobility device, as defined in Section 41-6a-102, in accordance with Section 41-6a-1116.(e)(d)A human driver operating an autocycle is not required to have a motorcycle endorsement issued under this chapter.(5)(a)As used in this Subsection (5), "personal electric vehicle safety certificate" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-6a-1512.(b)An individual under 16 years old:(i)is not required to hold a class D driver license or a motorcycle endorsement to operate an electric assisted bicycle on a highway; and(ii)may not operate an electric assisted bicycle on a highway unless:(A)the individual obtains a personal electric vehicle safety certificate; or(B)the individual is under direct supervision of the individual's parent or another responsible adult.(c)An individual who is 16 years old or older may operate an electric assisted bicycle or a motor assisted scooter on a highway without:(i)a class D driver license;(ii)a motorcycle endorsement; or(iii)a personal electric vehicle safety certificate.(d)Notwithstanding the requirement described in Subsection (4)(a)(i), an individual who is 16 years old or older may operate a high power electric device on a highway if the individual has a class D driver license.(6)A peace officer may not stop an individual under suspicion of that individual violating Subsection (5) unless the peace officer observes the individual violate another provision of law.(5)(7)An automated driving system as defined in Section 41-26-102.1 is not required to have a driver license.(6)(8)(a)A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction.(b)Except as provided in Subsection (6)(d)(8)(d), a personan individual who violates Subsection (4)(a)(i) or (4)(a)(iii) is subject to a minimum fine of $350.(c)The fine described in Subsection (6)(b)(8)(b) is in addition to any other fine for a violation of Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code, or a local ordinance related to the operation of the motorcycle.(d)(i)A court shall waive the fine imposed under Subsection (6)(b) (8)(b) if the personindividual provides to the court within 30 days of the date of the entry of a plea or sentencing, whichever is later, proof that the personindividual has been issued a motorcycle endorsement as provided in this chapter.(ii)A court may extend the 30-day time period described in Subsection (6)(d)(i) (8)(d)(i) for a reasonable time period for the person to obtain a motorcycle endorsement for good cause shown.

Section 23:
Section 23. Section 63I-1-241 is amended to read:63I-1-241Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 41.(1)Subsection 41-1a-1201(8), regarding the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Fund, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Subsection 41-6a-102(34)41-6a-102(39), regarding lane filtering, is repealed July 1, 2027.(3)Subsection 41-6a-704(6), regarding lane filtering, is repealed July 1, 2027.(4)Subsection 41-6a-710(1)(c), regarding lane filtering, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Subsection 41-6a-1406(7)(b)(iii), regarding the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Fund, is repealed July 1, 2029.(6)Subsection 41-22-2(1), regarding an advisory council addressing off-highway vehicle issues, is repealed July 1, 2027.(7)Subsection 41-22-10(1), regarding an advisory council addressing off-highway vehicle issues, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Subsection 41-22-8(3)(b), regarding the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Fund, is repealed July 1, 2029.

Section 24:
Section 24. Section 79-7-301 is amended to read:79-7-301Effective 05/06/26. Money to be appropriated -- Boating account expenses.(1)The Legislature shall appropriate the money from time to time necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter to the division to be used by the division in the administration of the powers and duties and in carrying out the objective and purposes prescribed bydescribed in this chapter.(2)Departmental operating and administrative expenses for the administration of the boating account of the division shall be charged against that account.

Section 25:
Section 25.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting the following sections take effect on May 5, 2027:(a)Section 41-6a-1115Effective 05/05/27;(b)Section 41-6a-1115.5Effective 05/05/27;(c)Section 41-6a-1512Effective 05/05/27; and(d)Section 53-3-202Effective 05/05/27.